Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6011SS (2) 91 ak/ko S.F. 2150 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 135.196 Pregnancy care for minors. 1 1. If a parent, guardian, or legal custodian of a minor 2 is not reasonably available, the minor shall have the 3 legal capacity to give consent to the provision of prenatal 4 care, intrapartum care, or postnatal care to the minor by a 5 physician, a physicianâs designee, an advanced registered 6 nurse practitioner, a physician assistant, a registered nurse, 7 a licensed practical nurse, or an emergency medical care 8 provider. 9 2. Subsection 1 shall not be construed to relieve a 10 physician, a physicianâs designee, an advanced registered nurse 11 practitioner, a physician assistant, a registered nurse, a 12 licensed practical nurse, or an emergency medical care provider 13 of the duty to obtain informed consent from the minor patient 14 for the provision of such care. 15